Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.380

Career and technical student organizations—Support services.

(1) To the extent funds are available, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain support for statewide coordination for career and technical student organizations by providing program staff support that is available to assist in meeting the needs of career and technical student organizations and their members and students. The superintendent may provide additional support to the organizations through contracting with independent coordinators.

(2) Career and technical student organizations eligible for technical assistance and other support services under this section are organizations recognized as career and technical student organizations by:

(a) The United States department of education; or

(b) The superintendent of public instruction, if such recognition is recommended by the Washington association for career and technical education.

(3) Career and technical student organizations eligible for technical assistance and other support services under this section include, but are not limited to: The national FFA organization; family, career, and community leaders of America; skillsUSA; distributive education clubs of America; future business leaders of America; and the technology student association.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 4; 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 913; 2000 c 84 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 27 ss 4 and 5: "Sections 4 and 5 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [June 7, 2011]." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 9.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Findings—2000 c 84: "(1) The legislature finds that career and technical student organizations:

(a) Prepare students for career experiences beyond high school;

(b) Help students develop personal, leadership, technical, and occupational skills;

(c) Are an integral component of vocational technical instruction programs; and

(d) Directly help students achieve state learning goals, especially goals three and four with respect to critical thinking, problem solving, and decision-making skills.

(2) The legislature finds that career and technical student organizations are best situated to fulfill their important purpose if they are in existence pursuant to statute and receive ongoing assistance and support from the office of superintendent of public instruction." [ 2000 c 84 s 1.]